el: Μέγεθος παπουτσιού: 0; 0,5; 1; 1,5; 10; 10,5; 11; 11,5; 12; 12,5; 13; 13,5; 14; 14,5; 15; 15,5; 16; 16,5; 17; 17,5; 18; 18,5; 19; 19,5; 2; 2,5; 20; 20,5; 21; 21,5; 22; 22,5; 23; 23,5; 24; 24,5; 25; 25,5; 26; 26,5; 27; 27,5; 28; 28,5; 29; 29,5; 3; 3,5; 30; 30,5; 31; 31,5; 32; 32,5; 33; 33,5; 34; 34,5; 35; 35,5; 36; 36,5; 37; 37,5; 38; 38,5; 39; 39,5; 4; 4,5; 40; 40,5; 41; 41,5; 42; 42,5; 43; 43,5; 44; 44,5; 45; 45,5; 46; 46,5; 47; 47,5; 48; 48,5; 49; 49,5; 5; 5,5; 50; 50,5; 51; 51,5; 52; 52,5; 53; 53,5; 54; 54,5; 55; 55,5; 56; 56,5; 57; 57,5; 58; 58,5; 59; 59,5; 6; 6,5; 60; 7; 7,5; 7XL; 8; 8,5; 8XL; 9; 9,5; Δύο extra large (XXL); Extra large (XL); Extra small (XS); Large (L); Medium (M); Small (S); Τρία extra large (XXXL); Άλλο
it: Numero di scarpa: 0; 0,5; 1; 1,5; 10; 10,5; 11; 11,5; 12; 12,5; 13; 13,5; 14; 14,5; 15; 15,5; 16; 16,5; 17; 17,5; 18; 18,5; 19; 19,5; 2; 2,5; 20; 20,5; 21; 21,5; 22; 22,5; 23; 23,5; 24; 24,5; 25; 25,5; 26; 26,5; 27; 27,5; 28; 28,5; 29; 29,5; 3; 3,5; 30; 30,5; 31; 31,5; 32; 32,5; 33; 33,5; 34; 34,5; 35; 35,5; 36; 36,5; 37; 37,5; 38; 38,5; 39; 39,5; 4; 4,5; 40; 40,5; 41; 41,5; 42; 42,5; 43; 43,5; 44; 44,5; 45; 45,5; 46; 46,5; 47; 47,5; 48; 48,5; 49; 49,5; 5; 5,5; 50; 50,5; 51; 51,5; 52; 52,5; 53; 53,5; 54; 54,5; 55; 55,5; 56; 56,5; 57; 57,5; 58; 58,5; 59; 59,5; 6; 6,5; 60; 7; 7,5; 7XL; 8; 8,5; 8XL; 9; 9,5; Doppia XL (XXL); Extra large (XL); Extra small (XS); Large (L); Medium (M); Small (S); Tripla XL (XXXL); Altro
pt-BR: Tamanho do calçado: 0; 0.5; 1; 1.5; 10; 10.5; 11; 11.5; 12; 12.5; 13; 13.5; 14; 14.5; 15; 15.5; 16; 16.5; 17; 17.5; 18; 18.5; 19; 19.5; 2; 2.5; 20; 20.5; 21; 21.5; 22; 22.5; 23; 23.5; 24; 24.5; 25; 25.5; 26; 26.5; 27; 27.5; 28; 28.5; 29; 29.5; 3; 3.5; 30; 30.5; 31; 31.5; 32; 32.5; 33; 33.5; 34; 34.5; 35; 35.5; 36; 36.5; 37; 37.5; 38; 38.5; 39; 39.5; 4; 4.5; 40; 40.5; 41; 41.5; 42; 42.5; 43; 43.5; 44; 44.5; 45; 45.5; 46; 46.5; 47; 47.5; 48; 48.5; 49; 49.5; 5; 5.5; 50; 50.5; 51; 51.5; 52; 52.5; 53; 53.5; 54; 54.5; 55; 55.5; 56; 56.5; 57; 57.5; 58; 58.5; 59; 59.5; 6; 6.5; 60; 7; 7.5; 7XL; 8; 8.5; 8XL; 9; 9.5; Duplo extra grande (XXG); Extra grande (XG); Extra pequeno (XP); Grande (G); Médio (M); Pequeno (P); Triplo extra grande (XXXG); Outro
lt-LT: Batų dydis: 0; 0,5; 1; 1,5; 10; 10,5; 11; 11,5; 12; 12,5; 13; 13,5; 14; 14,5; 15; 15,5; 16; 16,5; 17; 17,5; 18; 18,5; 19; 19,5; 2; 2,5; 20; 20,5; 21; 21,5; 22; 22,5; 23; 23,5; 24; 24,5; 25; 25,5; 26; 26,5; 27; 27,5; 28; 28,5; 29; 29,5; 3; 3,5; 30; 30,5; 31; 31,5; 32; 32,5; 33; 33,5; 34; 34,5; 35; 35,5; 36; 36,5; 37; 37,5; 38; 38,5; 39; 39,5; 4; 4,5; 40; 40,5; 41; 41,5; 42; 42,5; 43; 43,5; 44; 44,5; 45; 45,5; 46; 46,5; 47; 47,5; 48; 48,5; 49; 49,5; 5; 5,5; 50; 50,5; 51; 51,5; 52; 52,5; 53; 53,5; 54; 54,5; 55; 55,5; 56; 56,5; 57; 57,5; 58; 58,5; 59; 59,5; 6; 6,5; 60; 7; 7,5; 7XL; 8; 8,5; 8XL; 9; 9,5; 2XL (XXL); Itin didelis (XL); Itin mažas (XS); Didelis (L); Vidutinis (M); Mažas (S); 3XL (XXXL); Kita
vi: Kích cỡ giày: 0; 0.5; 1; 1.5; 10; 10.5; 11; 11.5; 12; 12.5; 13; 13.5; 14; 14.5; 15; 15.5; 16; 16.5; 17; 17.5; 18; 18.5; 19; 19.5; 2; 2.5; 20; 20.5; 21; 21.5; 22; 22.5; 23; 23.5; 24; 24.5; 25; 25.5; 26; 26.5; 27; 27.5; 28; 28.5; 29; 29.5; 3; 3.5; 30; 30.5; 31; 31.5; 32; 32.5; 33; 33.5; 34; 34.5; 35; 35.5; 36; 36.5; 37; 37.5; 38; 38.5; 39; 39.5; 4; 4.5; 40; 40.5; 41; 41.5; 42; 42.5; 43; 43.5; 44; 44.5; 45; 45.5; 46; 46.5; 47; 47.5; 48; 48.5; 49; 49.5; 5; 5.5; 50; 50.5; 51; 51.5; 52; 52.5; 53; 53.5; 54; 54.5; 55; 55.5; 56; 56.5; 57; 57.5; 58; 58.5; 59; 59.5; 6; 6.5; 60; 7; 7.5; 7XL; 8; 8.5; 8XL; 9; 9.5; Rất rất lớn (XXL); Rất lớn (XL); Rất nhỏ (XS); Lớn (L); Trung bình (M); Nhỏ (S); Siêu lớn (XXXL); Khác
ru: Размер обуви: 0; 0.5; 1; 1.5; 10; 10.5; 11; 11.5; 12; 12.5; 13; 13.5; 14; 14.5; 15; 15.5; 16; 16.5; 17; 17.5; 18; 18.5; 19; 19.5; 2; 2.5; 20; 20.5; 21; 21.5; 22; 22.5; 23; 23.5; 24; 24.5; 25; 25.5; 26; 26.5; 27; 27.5; 28; 28.5; 29; 29.5; 3; 3.5; 30; 30.5; 31; 31.5; 32; 32.5; 33; 33.5; 34; 34.5; 35; 35.5; 36; 36.5; 37; 37.5; 38; 38.5; 39; 39.5; 4; 4.5; 40; 40.5; 41; 41.5; 42; 42.5; 43; 43.5; 44; 44.5; 45; 45.5; 46; 46.5; 47; 47.5; 48; 48.5; 49; 49.5; 5; 5.5; 50; 50.5; 51; 51.5; 52; 52.5; 53; 53.5; 54; 54.5; 55; 55.5; 56; 56.5; 57; 57.5; 58; 58.5; 59; 59.5; 6; 6.5; 60; 7; 7.5; 7XL; 8; 8.5; 8XL; 9; 9.5; Двойной очень большой (XXL); Очень большой (XL); Очень маленький (XS); Большой (L); Средний (М); Маленький (S); Тройной очень большой (XXXL); Другой
es: Talla del calzado: 0; 0.5; 1; 1.5; 10; 10.5; 11; 11.5; 12; 12.5; 13; 13.5; 14; 14.5; 15; 15.5; 16; 16.5; 17; 17.5; 18; 18.5; 19; 19.5; 2; 2.5; 20; 20.5; 21; 21.5; 22; 22.5; 23; 23.5; 24; 24.5; 25; 25.5; 26; 26.5; 27; 27.5; 28; 28.5; 29; 29.5; 3; 3.5; 30; 30.5; 31; 31.5; 32; 32.5; 33; 33.5; 34; 34.5; 35; 35.5; 36; 36.5; 37; 37.5; 38; 38.5; 39; 39.5; 4; 4.5; 40; 40.5; 41; 41.5; 42; 42.5; 43; 43.5; 44; 44.5; 45; 45.5; 46; 46.5; 47; 47.5; 48; 48.5; 49; 49.5; 5; 5.5; 50; 50.5; 51; 51.5; 52; 52.5; 53; 53.5; 54; 54.5; 55; 55.5; 56; 56.5; 57; 57.5; 58; 58.5; 59; 59.5; 6; 6.5; 60; 7; 7.5; 7XL; 8; 8.5; 8XL; 9; 9.5; Doble extragrande (XXL); Extragrande (XL); Extrapequeño (XS); Grande (L); Mediano (M); Pequeño (S); Triple extragrande (XXXL); Otros
pl: Rozmiar buta: 0; 0.5; 1; 1.5; 10; 10.5; 11; 11.5; 12; 12.5; 13; 13.5; 14; 14.5; 15; 15.5; 16; 16.5; 17; 17.5; 18; 18.5; 19; 19.5; 2; 2.5; 20; 20.5; 21; 21.5; 22; 22.5; 23; 23.5; 24; 24.5; 25; 25.5; 26; 26.5; 27; 27.5; 28; 28.5; 29; 29.5; 3; 3.5; 30; 30.5; 31; 31.5; 32; 32.5; 33; 33.5; 34; 34.5; 35; 35.5; 36; 36.5; 37; 37.5; 38; 38.5; 39; 39.5; 4; 4.5; 40; 40.5; 41; 41.5; 42; 42.5; 43; 43.5; 44; 44.5; 45; 45.5; 46; 46.5; 47; 47.5; 48; 48.5; 49; 49.5; 5; 5.5; 50; 50.5; 51; 51.5; 52; 52.5; 53; 53.5; 54; 54.5; 55; 55.5; 56; 56.5; 57; 57.5; 58; 58.5; 59; 59.5; 6; 6.5; 60; 7; 7.5; 7XL; 8; 8.5; 8XL; 9; 9.5; Double extra large (XXL); Extra large (XL); Extra small (XS); Large (L); Medium (M); Small (S); Triple extra large (XXXL); Inne
ja: 靴のサイズ: 0; 0.5; 1; 1.5; 10; 10.5; 11; 11.5; 12; 12.5; 13; 13.5; 14; 14.5; 15; 15.5; 16; 16.5; 17; 17.5; 18; 18.5; 19; 19.5; 2; 2.5; 20; 20.5; 21; 21.5; 22; 22.5; 23; 23.5; 24; 24.5; 25; 25.5; 26; 26.5; 27; 27.5; 28; 28.5; 29; 29.5; 3; 3.5; 30; 30.5; 31; 31.5; 32; 32.5; 33; 33.5; 34; 34.5; 35; 35.5; 36; 36.5; 37; 37.5; 38; 38.5; 39; 39.5; 4; 4.5; 40; 40.5; 41; 41.5; 42; 42.5; 43; 43.5; 44; 44.5; 45; 45.5; 46; 46.5; 47; 47.5; 48; 48.5; 49; 49.5; 5; 5.5; 50; 50.5; 51; 51.5; 52; 52.5; 53; 53.5; 54; 54.5; 55; 55.5; 56; 56.5; 57; 57.5; 58; 58.5; 59; 59.5; 6; 6.5; 60; 7; 7.5; 7XL; 8; 8.5; 8XL; 9; 9.5; ダブルエクストララージ (XXL); エクストララージ (XL); エクストラスモール (XS); ラージ (L); ミディアム (M); スモール (S); トリプルエクストララージ (XXXL); その他
fi: Kengänkoko: 0; 0.5; 1; 1.5; 10; 10.5; 11; 11.5; 12; 12.5; 13; 13.5; 14; 14.5; 15; 15.5; 16; 16.5; 17; 17.5; 18; 18.5; 19; 19.5; 2; 2.5; 20; 20.5; 21; 21.5; 22; 22.5; 23; 23.5; 24; 24.5; 25; 25.5; 26; 26.5; 27; 27.5; 28; 28.5; 29; 29.5; 3; 3.5; 30; 30.5; 31; 31.5; 32; 32.5; 33; 33.5; 34; 34.5; 35; 35.5; 36; 36.5; 37; 37.5; 38; 38.5; 39; 39.5; 4; 4.5; 40; 40.5; 41; 41.5; 42; 42.5; 43; 43.5; 44; 44.5; 45; 45.5; 46; 46.5; 47; 47.5; 48; 48.5; 49; 49.5; 5; 5.5; 50; 50.5; 51; 51.5; 52; 52.5; 53; 53.5; 54; 54.5; 55; 55.5; 56; 56.5; 57; 57.5; 58; 58.5; 59; 59.5; 6; 6.5; 60; 7; 7.5; 7XL; 8; 8.5; 8XL; 9; 9.5; Erittäin erittäin suuri (XXL); Erittäin suuri (XL); Erittäin pieni (XS); Suuri (L); Keskikokoinen (M); Pieni (S); 3 erittäin suuri (XXXL); Muu
hu: Cipő mérete: 0; 0.5; 1; 1.5; 10; 10.5; 11; 11.5; 12; 12.5; 13; 13.5; 14; 14.5; 15; 15.5; 16; 16.5; 17; 17.5; 18; 18.5; 19; 19.5; 2; 2.5; 20; 20.5; 21; 21.5; 22; 22.5; 23; 23.5; 24; 24.5; 25; 25.5; 26; 26.5; 27; 27.5; 28; 28.5; 29; 29.5; 3; 3.5; 30; 30.5; 31; 31.5; 32; 32.5; 33; 33.5; 34; 34.5; 35; 35.5; 36; 36.5; 37; 37.5; 38; 38.5; 39; 39.5; 4; 4.5; 40; 40.5; 41; 41.5; 42; 42.5; 43; 43.5; 44; 44.5; 45; 45.5; 46; 46.5; 47; 47.5; 48; 48.5; 49; 49.5; 5; 5.5; 50; 50.5; 51; 51.5; 52; 52.5; 53; 53.5; 54; 54.5; 55; 55.5; 56; 56.5; 57; 57.5; 58; 58.5; 59; 59.5; 6; 6.5; 60; 7; 7.5; 7XL; 8; 8.5; 8XL; 9; 9.5; Dupla extra nagy (XXL); Extra nagy (XL); Extra kicsi (XS); Nagy (L); Közepes (M); Kicsi (S); Tripla extra nagy (XXXL); Egyéb
bg-BG: Размер на обувките: 0; 0.5; 1; 1.5; 10; 10.5; 11; 11.5; 12; 12.5; 13; 13.5; 14; 14.5; 15; 15.5; 16; 16.5; 17; 17.5; 18; 18.5; 19; 19.5; 2; 2.5; 20; 20.5; 21; 21.5; 22; 22.5; 23; 23.5; 24; 24.5; 25; 25.5; 26; 26.5; 27; 27.5; 28; 28.5; 29; 29.5; 3; 3.5; 30; 30.5; 31; 31.5; 32; 32.5; 33; 33.5; 34; 34.5; 35; 35.5; 36; 36.5; 37; 37.5; 38; 38.5; 39; 39.5; 4; 4.5; 40; 40.5; 41; 41.5; 42; 42.5; 43; 43.5; 44; 44.5; 45; 45.5; 46; 46.5; 47; 47.5; 48; 48.5; 49; 49.5; 5; 5.5; 50; 50.5; 51; 51.5; 52; 52.5; 53; 53.5; 54; 54.5; 55; 55.5; 56; 56.5; 57; 57.5; 58; 58.5; 59; 59.5; 6; 6.5; 60; 7; 7.5; 7XL; 8; 8.5; 8XL; 9; 9.5; Двойно екстра голямо (XXL); Екстра голямо (XL); Екстра малко (XS); Голямо (L); Средно (M); Малко (S); Тройно екстра голямо (XXL); Други
nb: Skostørrelse: 0; 0.5; 1; 1.5; 10; 10.5; 11; 11.5; 12; 12.5; 13; 13.5; 14; 14.5; 15; 15.5; 16; 16.5; 17; 17.5; 18; 18.5; 19; 19.5; 2; 2.5; 20; 20.5; 21; 21.5; 22; 22.5; 23; 23.5; 24; 24.5; 25; 25.5; 26; 26.5; 27; 27.5; 28; 28.5; 29; 29.5; 3; 3.5; 30; 30.5; 31; 31.5; 32; 32.5; 33; 33.5; 34; 34.5; 35; 35.5; 36; 36.5; 37; 37.5; 38; 38.5; 39; 39.5; 4; 4.5; 40; 40.5; 41; 41.5; 42; 42.5; 43; 43.5; 44; 44.5; 45; 45.5; 46; 46.5; 47; 47.5; 48; 48.5; 49; 49.5; 5; 5.5; 50; 50.5; 51; 51.5; 52; 52.5; 53; 53.5; 54; 54.5; 55; 55.5; 56; 56.5; 57; 57.5; 58; 58.5; 59; 59.5; 6; 6.5; 60; 7; 7.5; 7XL; 8; 8.5; 8XL; 9; 9.5; Dobbel ekstra stor (XXL); Ekstra stor (XL); Ekstra liten (XS); Stor (L); Middels (M); Liten (S); Trippel ekstra stor (XXXL); Annet
zh-CN: 鞋码: 0; 0.5; 1; 1.5; 10; 10.5; 11; 11.5; 12; 12.5; 13; 13.5; 14; 14.5; 15; 15.5; 16; 16.5; 17; 17.5; 18; 18.5; 19; 19.5; 2; 2.5; 20; 20.5; 21; 21.5; 22; 22.5; 23; 23.5; 24; 24.5; 25; 25.5; 26; 26.5; 27; 27.5; 28; 28.5; 29; 29.5; 3; 3.5; 30; 30.5; 31; 31.5; 32; 32.5; 33; 33.5; 34; 34.5; 35; 35.5; 36; 36.5; 37; 37.5; 38; 38.5; 39; 39.5; 4; 4.5; 40; 40.5; 41; 41.5; 42; 42.5; 43; 43.5; 44; 44.5; 45; 45.5; 46; 46.5; 47; 47.5; 48; 48.5; 49; 49.5; 5; 5.5; 50; 50.5; 51; 51.5; 52; 52.5; 53; 53.5; 54; 54.5; 55; 55.5; 56; 56.5; 57; 57.5; 58; 58.5; 59; 59.5; 6; 6.5; 60; 7; 7.5; 7XL; 8; 8.5; 8XL; 9; 9.5; 超特大号 (XXL); 特大号 (XL); 特小号 (XS); 大号 (L); 中号 (M); 小号 (S); 三加特大号 (XXL); 其他
ro-RO: Mărimea pantofilor: 0; 0,5; 1; 1,5; 10; 10,5; 11; 11,5; 12; 12,5; 13; 13,5; 14; 14,5; 15; 15,5; 16; 16,5; 17; 17,5; 18; 18,5; 19; 19,5; 2; 2,5; 20; 20,5; 21; 21,5; 22; 22,5; 23; 23,5; 24; 24,5; 25; 25,5; 26; 26,5; 27; 27,5; 28; 28,5; 29; 29,5; 3; 3,5; 30; 30,5; 31; 31,5; 32; 32,5; 33; 33,5; 34; 34,5; 35; 35,5; 36; 36,5; 37; 37,5; 38; 38,5; 39; 39,5; 4; 4,5; 40; 40,5; 41; 41,5; 42; 42,5; 43; 43,5; 44; 44,5; 45; 45,5; 46; 46,5; 47; 47,5; 48; 48,5; 49; 49,5; 5; 5,5; 50; 50,5; 51; 51,5; 52; 52,5; 53; 53,5; 54; 54,5; 55; 55,5; 56; 56,5; 57; 57,5; 58; 58,5; 59; 59,5; 6; 6,5; 60; 7; 7,5; 7XL; 8; 8,5; 8XL; 9; 9,5; Double extra large (XXL); Extra large (XL); Extra small (XS); Large (L); Medium (M); Small (S); Triple extra large (XXXL); Altele
sl-SI: Velikost čevljev: 0; 0,5; 1; 1,5; 10; 10,5; 11; 11,5; 12; 12,5; 13; 13,5; 14; 14,5; 15; 15,5; 16; 16,5; 17; 17,5; 18; 18,5; 19; 19,5; 2; 2,5; 20; 20,5; 21; 21,5; 22; 22,5; 23; 23,5; 24; 24,5; 25; 25,5; 26; 26,5; 27; 27,5; 28; 28,5; 29; 29,5; 3; 3,5; 30; 30,5; 31; 31,5; 32; 32,5; 33; 33,5; 34; 34,5; 35; 35,5; 36; 36,5; 37; 37,5; 38; 38,5; 39; 39,5; 4; 4,5; 40; 40,5; 41; 41,5; 42; 42,5; 43; 43,5; 44; 44,5; 45; 45,5; 46; 46,5; 47; 47,5; 48; 48,5; 49; 49,5; 5; 5,5; 50; 50,5; 51; 51,5; 52; 52,5; 53; 53,5; 54; 54,5; 55; 55,5; 56; 56,5; 57; 57,5; 58; 58,5; 59; 59,5; 6; 6,5; 60; 7; 7,5; 7XL; 8; 8,5; 8XL; 9; 9,5; Dvojna ekstra velika (XXL); Ekstra velika (XL); Ekstra majhna (XS); Velika (L); Srednja (M); Majhna (S); Trojna ekstra velika (XXXL); Drugo
en: Shoe size: 0; 0.5; 1; 1.5; 10; 10.5; 11; 11.5; 12; 12.5; 13; 13.5; 14; 14.5; 15; 15.5; 16; 16.5; 17; 17.5; 18; 18.5; 19; 19.5; 2; 2.5; 20; 20.5; 21; 21.5; 22; 22.5; 23; 23.5; 24; 24.5; 25; 25.5; 26; 26.5; 27; 27.5; 28; 28.5; 29; 29.5; 3; 3.5; 30; 30.5; 31; 31.5; 32; 32.5; 33; 33.5; 34; 34.5; 35; 35.5; 36; 36.5; 37; 37.5; 38; 38.5; 39; 39.5; 4; 4.5; 40; 40.5; 41; 41.5; 42; 42.5; 43; 43.5; 44; 44.5; 45; 45.5; 46; 46.5; 47; 47.5; 48; 48.5; 49; 49.5; 5; 5.5; 50; 50.5; 51; 51.5; 52; 52.5; 53; 53.5; 54; 54.5; 55; 55.5; 56; 56.5; 57; 57.5; 58; 58.5; 59; 59.5; 6; 6.5; 60; 7; 7.5; 7XL; 8; 8.5; 8XL; 9; 9.5; Double extra large (XXL); Extra large (XL); Extra small (XS); Large (L); Medium (M); Small (S); Triple extra large (XXXL); Other
th: ขนาดรองเท้า: 0; 0.5; 1; 1.5; 10; 10.5; 11; 11.5; 12; 12.5; 13; 13.5; 14; 14.5; 15; 15.5; 16; 16.5; 17; 17.5; 18; 18.5; 19; 19.5; 2; 2.5; 20; 20.5; 21; 21.5; 22; 22.5; 23; 23.5; 24; 24.5; 25; 25.5; 26; 26.5; 27; 27.5; 28; 28.5; 29; 29.5; 3; 3.5; 30; 30.5; 31; 31.5; 32; 32.5; 33; 33.5; 34; 34.5; 35; 35.5; 36; 36.5; 37; 37.5; 38; 38.5; 39; 39.5; 4; 4.5; 40; 40.5; 41; 41.5; 42; 42.5; 43; 43.5; 44; 44.5; 45; 45.5; 46; 46.5; 47; 47.5; 48; 48.5; 49; 49.5; 5; 5.5; 50; 50.5; 51; 51.5; 52; 52.5; 53; 53.5; 54; 54.5; 55; 55.5; 56; 56.5; 57; 57.5; 58; 58.5; 59; 59.5; 6; 6.5; 60; 7; 7.5; 7XL; 8; 8.5; 8XL; 9; 9.5; ขนาดใหญ่พิเศษสองเท่า (XXL); ขนาดใหญ่พิเศษ (XL); ขนาดเล็กพิเศษ (XS); ขนาดใหญ่ (L); ขนาดกลาง (M); ขนาดเล็ก (S); ขนาดใหญ่พิเศษสามเท่า (XXXL); อื่นๆ
ko: 신발 사이즈: 0; 0.5; 1; 1.5; 10; 10.5; 11; 11.5; 12; 12.5; 13; 13.5; 14; 14.5; 15; 15.5; 16; 16.5; 17; 17.5; 18; 18.5; 19; 19.5; 2; 2.5; 20; 20.5; 21; 21.5; 22; 22.5; 23; 23.5; 24; 24.5; 25; 25.5; 26; 26.5; 27; 27.5; 28; 28.5; 29; 29.5; 3; 3.5; 30; 30.5; 31; 31.5; 32; 32.5; 33; 33.5; 34; 34.5; 35; 35.5; 36; 36.5; 37; 37.5; 38; 38.5; 39; 39.5; 4; 4.5; 40; 40.5; 41; 41.5; 42; 42.5; 43; 43.5; 44; 44.5; 45; 45.5; 46; 46.5; 47; 47.5; 48; 48.5; 49; 49.5; 5; 5.5; 50; 50.5; 51; 51.5; 52; 52.5; 53; 53.5; 54; 54.5; 55; 55.5; 56; 56.5; 57; 57.5; 58; 58.5; 59; 59.5; 6; 6.5; 60; 7; 7.5; 7XL; 8; 8.5; 8XL; 9; 9.5; 2XL(XXL); XL(XL); XS(XS); 라지(L); 미디엄(M); 스몰(S); 3XL(XXXL); 기타
de: Schuhgröße: 0; 0.5; 1; 1.5; 10; 10.5; 11; 11.5; 12; 12.5; 13; 13.5; 14; 14.5; 15; 15.5; 16; 16.5; 17; 17.5; 18; 18.5; 19; 19.5; 2; 2.5; 20; 20.5; 21; 21.5; 22; 22.5; 23; 23.5; 24; 24.5; 25; 25.5; 26; 26.5; 27; 27.5; 28; 28.5; 29; 29.5; 3; 3.5; 30; 30.5; 31; 31.5; 32; 32.5; 33; 33.5; 34; 34.5; 35; 35.5; 36; 36.5; 37; 37.5; 38; 38.5; 39; 39.5; 4; 4.5; 40; 40.5; 41; 41.5; 42; 42.5; 43; 43.5; 44; 44.5; 45; 45.5; 46; 46.5; 47; 47.5; 48; 48.5; 49; 49.5; 5; 5.5; 50; 50.5; 51; 51.5; 52; 52.5; 53; 53.5; 54; 54.5; 55; 55.5; 56; 56.5; 57; 57.5; 58; 58.5; 59; 59.5; 6; 6.5; 60; 7; 7.5; 7XL; 8; 8.5; 8XL; 9; 9.5; XXL; XL; XS; L; M; S; XXXL; Sonstiges
fr: Pointure: 0; 0.5; 1; 1.5; 10; 10.5; 11; 11.5; 12; 12.5; 13; 13.5; 14; 14.5; 15; 15.5; 16; 16.5; 17; 17.5; 18; 18.5; 19; 19.5; 2; 2.5; 20; 20.5; 21; 21.5; 22; 22.5; 23; 23.5; 24; 24.5; 25; 25.5; 26; 26.5; 27; 27.5; 28; 28.5; 29; 29.5; 3; 3.5; 30; 30.5; 31; 31.5; 32; 32.5; 33; 33.5; 34; 34.5; 35; 35.5; 36; 36.5; 37; 37.5; 38; 38.5; 39; 39.5; 4; 4.5; 40; 40.5; 41; 41.5; 42; 42.5; 43; 43.5; 44; 44.5; 45; 45.5; 46; 46.5; 47; 47.5; 48; 48.5; 49; 49.5; 5; 5.5; 50; 50.5; 51; 51.5; 52; 52.5; 53; 53.5; 54; 54.5; 55; 55.5; 56; 56.5; 57; 57.5; 58; 58.5; 59; 59.5; 6; 6.5; 60; 7; 7.5; 7XL; 8; 8.5; 8XL; 9; 9.5; Double XL (XXL); Extra large (XL); Très petite taille (XS); Taille large (L); Taille moyenne (M); Petite taille (S); Triple XL (XXL); Autre
nl: Schoenmaat: 0; 0.5; 1; 1.5; 10; 10.5; 11; 11.5; 12; 12.5; 13; 13.5; 14; 14.5; 15; 15.5; 16; 16.5; 17; 17.5; 18; 18.5; 19; 19.5; 2; 2.5; 20; 20.5; 21; 21.5; 22; 22.5; 23; 23.5; 24; 24.5; 25; 25.5; 26; 26.5; 27; 27.5; 28; 28.5; 29; 29.5; 3; 3.5; 30; 30.5; 31; 31.5; 32; 32.5; 33; 33.5; 34; 34.5; 35; 35.5; 36; 36.5; 37; 37.5; 38; 38.5; 39; 39.5; 4; 4.5; 40; 40.5; 41; 41.5; 42; 42.5; 43; 43.5; 44; 44.5; 45; 45.5; 46; 46.5; 47; 47.5; 48; 48.5; 49; 49.5; 5; 5.5; 50; 50.5; 51; 51.5; 52; 52.5; 53; 53.5; 54; 54.5; 55; 55.5; 56; 56.5; 57; 57.5; 58; 58.5; 59; 59.5; 6; 6.5; 60; 7; 7.5; 7XL; 8; 8.5; 8XL; 9; 9.5; Dubbel extra groot (XXL); Extra groot (XL); Extra klein (XS); Groot (L); Middel (M); Klein (S); Driedubbel extra groot (XXXL); Andere
zh-TW: 鞋款尺碼: 0; 0.5; 1; 1.5; 10; 10.5; 11; 11.5; 12; 12.5; 13; 13.5; 14; 14.5; 15; 15.5; 16; 16.5; 17; 17.5; 18; 18.5; 19; 19.5; 2; 2.5; 20; 20.5; 21; 21.5; 22; 22.5; 23; 23.5; 24; 24.5; 25; 25.5; 26; 26.5; 27; 27.5; 28; 28.5; 29; 29.5; 3; 3.5; 30; 30.5; 31; 31.5; 32; 32.5; 33; 33.5; 34; 34.5; 35; 35.5; 36; 36.5; 37; 37.5; 38; 38.5; 39; 39.5; 4; 4.5; 40; 40.5; 41; 41.5; 42; 42.5; 43; 43.5; 44; 44.5; 45; 45.5; 46; 46.5; 47; 47.5; 48; 48.5; 49; 49.5; 5; 5.5; 50; 50.5; 51; 51.5; 52; 52.5; 53; 53.5; 54; 54.5; 55; 55.5; 56; 56.5; 57; 57.5; 58; 58.5; 59; 59.5; 6; 6.5; 60; 7; 7.5; 7XL; 8; 8.5; 8XL; 9; 9.5; 超特大號 (XXL); 特大號 (XL); 特小號 (XS); 大號 (L); 中號（M）; 小 (S); 超特大號 (XXXL); 其他
sk-SK: Veľkosť topánok: 0; 0,5; 1; 1,5; 10; 10,5; 11; 11,5; 12; 12,5; 13; 13,5; 14; 14,5; 15; 15,5; 16; 16,5; 17; 17,5; 18; 18,5; 19; 19,5; 2; 2,5; 20; 20,5; 21; 21,5; 22; 22,5; 23; 23,5; 24; 24,5; 25; 25,5; 26; 26,5; 27; 27,5; 28; 28,5; 29; 29,5; 3; 3,5; 30; 30,5; 31; 31,5; 32; 32,5; 33; 33,5; 34; 34,5; 35; 35,5; 36; 36,5; 37; 37,5; 38; 38,5; 39; 39,5; 4; 4,5; 40; 40,5; 41; 41,5; 42; 42,5; 43; 43,5; 44; 44,5; 45; 45,5; 46; 46,5; 47; 47,5; 48; 48,5; 49; 49,5; 5; 5,5; 50; 50,5; 51; 51,5; 52; 52,5; 53; 53,5; 54; 54,5; 55; 55,5; 56; 56,5; 57; 57,5; 58; 58,5; 59; 59,5; 6; 6,5; 60; 7; 7,5; 7XL; 8; 8,5; 8XL; 9; 9,5; Dvojitý extra veľký (XXL); Extra veľký (XL); Extra malý (XS); Veľký (L); Stredný (M); Malý (S); Trojitý extra veľký (XXXL); Iné
cs: Velikost obuvi: 0; 0.5; 1; 1.5; 10; 10.5; 11; 11.5; 12; 12.5; 13; 13.5; 14; 14.5; 15; 15.5; 16; 16.5; 17; 17.5; 18; 18.5; 19; 19.5; 2; 2.5; 20; 20.5; 21; 21.5; 22; 22.5; 23; 23.5; 24; 24.5; 25; 25.5; 26; 26.5; 27; 27.5; 28; 28.5; 29; 29.5; 3; 3.5; 30; 30.5; 31; 31.5; 32; 32.5; 33; 33.5; 34; 34.5; 35; 35.5; 36; 36.5; 37; 37.5; 38; 38.5; 39; 39.5; 4; 4.5; 40; 40.5; 41; 41.5; 42; 42.5; 43; 43.5; 44; 44.5; 45; 45.5; 46; 46.5; 47; 47.5; 48; 48.5; 49; 49.5; 5; 5.5; 50; 50.5; 51; 51.5; 52; 52.5; 53; 53.5; 54; 54.5; 55; 55.5; 56; 56.5; 57; 57.5; 58; 58.5; 59; 59.5; 6; 6.5; 60; 7; 7.5; 7XL; 8; 8.5; 8XL; 9; 9.5; Velmi velmi velké (XXL); Velmi velké (XL); Velmi malé (XS); Velké (L); Střední (M); Malé (S); Velmi velmi velmi velké (XXXL); Jiné
tr: Ayakkabı Numarası: 0; 0.5; 1; 1.5; 10; 10.5; 11; 11.5; 12; 12.5; 13; 13.5; 14; 14.5; 15; 15.5; 16; 16.5; 17; 17.5; 18; 18.5; 19; 19.5; 2; 2.5; 20; 20.5; 21; 21.5; 22; 22.5; 23; 23.5; 24; 24.5; 25; 25.5; 26; 26.5; 27; 27.5; 28; 28.5; 29; 29.5; 3; 3.5; 30; 30.5; 31; 31.5; 32; 32.5; 33; 33.5; 34; 34.5; 35; 35.5; 36; 36.5; 37; 37.5; 38; 38.5; 39; 39.5; 4; 4.5; 40; 40.5; 41; 41.5; 42; 42.5; 43; 43.5; 44; 44.5; 45; 45.5; 46; 46.5; 47; 47.5; 48; 48.5; 49; 49.5; 5; 5.5; 50; 50.5; 51; 51.5; 52; 52.5; 53; 53.5; 54; 54.5; 55; 55.5; 56; 56.5; 57; 57.5; 58; 58.5; 59; 59.5; 6; 6.5; 60; 7; 7.5; 7XL; 8; 8.5; 8XL; 9; 9.5; İki X large (XXL); X large (XL); X small (XS); Large (L); Medium (M); Small (S); Üç X large (XXXL); Diğer
da: Skostørrelse: 0; 0.5; 1; 1.5; 10; 10.5; 11; 11.5; 12; 12.5; 13; 13.5; 14; 14.5; 15; 15.5; 16; 16.5; 17; 17.5; 18; 18.5; 19; 19.5; 2; 2.5; 20; 20.5; 21; 21.5; 22; 22.5; 23; 23.5; 24; 24.5; 25; 25.5; 26; 26.5; 27; 27.5; 28; 28.5; 29; 29.5; 3; 3.5; 30; 30.5; 31; 31.5; 32; 32.5; 33; 33.5; 34; 34.5; 35; 35.5; 36; 36.5; 37; 37.5; 38; 38.5; 39; 39.5; 4; 4.5; 40; 40.5; 41; 41.5; 42; 42.5; 43; 43.5; 44; 44.5; 45; 45.5; 46; 46.5; 47; 47.5; 48; 48.5; 49; 49.5; 5; 5.5; 50; 50.5; 51; 51.5; 52; 52.5; 53; 53.5; 54; 54.5; 55; 55.5; 56; 56.5; 57; 57.5; 58; 58.5; 59; 59.5; 6; 6.5; 60; 7; 7.5; 7XL; 8; 8.5; 8XL; 9; 9.5; XXL; XL; XS; Large (L); Medium (M); Small (S); XXXL; Andet
hr-HR: Veličina obuće: 0; 0,5; 1; 1,5; 10; 10,5; 11; 11,5; 12; 12,5; 13; 13,5; 14; 14,5; 15; 15,5; 16; 16,5; 17; 17,5; 18; 18,5; 19; 19,5; 2; 2,5; 20; 20,5; 21; 21,5; 22; 22,5; 23; 23,5; 24; 24,5; 25; 25,5; 26; 26,5; 27; 27,5; 28; 28,5; 29; 29,5; 3; 3,5; 30; 30,5; 31; 31,5; 32; 32,5; 33; 33,5; 34; 34,5; 35; 35,5; 36; 36,5; 37; 37,5; 38; 38,5; 39; 39,5; 4; 4,5; 40; 40,5; 41; 41,5; 42; 42,5; 43; 43,5; 44; 44,5; 45; 45,5; 46; 46,5; 47; 47,5; 48; 48,5; 49; 49,5; 5; 5,5; 50; 50,5; 51; 51,5; 52; 52,5; 53; 53,5; 54; 54,5; 55; 55,5; 56; 56,5; 57; 57,5; 58; 58,5; 59; 59,5; 6; 6,5; 60; 7; 7,5; 7XL; 8; 8,5; 8XL; 9; 9,5; Dvostruko ekstra veliko (XXL); Ekstra veliko (XL); Ekstra malo (XS); Veliko (L); Srednje (M); Malo (S); Trostruko ekstra veliko (XXXL); Ostalo
pt-PT: Tamanho de calçado: 0; 0.5; 1; 1.5; 10; 10.5; 11; 11.5; 12; 12.5; 13; 13.5; 14; 14.5; 15; 15.5; 16; 16.5; 17; 17.5; 18; 18.5; 19; 19.5; 2; 2.5; 20; 20.5; 21; 21.5; 22; 22.5; 23; 23.5; 24; 24.5; 25; 25.5; 26; 26.5; 27; 27.5; 28; 28.5; 29; 29.5; 3; 3.5; 30; 30.5; 31; 31.5; 32; 32.5; 33; 33.5; 34; 34.5; 35; 35.5; 36; 36.5; 37; 37.5; 38; 38.5; 39; 39.5; 4; 4.5; 40; 40.5; 41; 41.5; 42; 42.5; 43; 43.5; 44; 44.5; 45; 45.5; 46; 46.5; 47; 47.5; 48; 48.5; 49; 49.5; 5; 5.5; 50; 50.5; 51; 51.5; 52; 52.5; 53; 53.5; 54; 54.5; 55; 55.5; 56; 56.5; 57; 57.5; 58; 58.5; 59; 59.5; 6; 6.5; 60; 7; 7.5; 7XL; 8; 8.5; 8XL; 9; 9.5; Duplo extra grande (XXL); Extra grande (XL); Extra pequeno (XS); Grande (L); Médio (M); Pequeno (S); Triplo extra grande (XXXL); Outro
sv: Skostorlek: 0; 0.5; 1; 1.5; 10; 10.5; 11; 11.5; 12; 12.5; 13; 13.5; 14; 14.5; 15; 15.5; 16; 16.5; 17; 17.5; 18; 18.5; 19; 19.5; 2; 2.5; 20; 20.5; 21; 21.5; 22; 22.5; 23; 23.5; 24; 24.5; 25; 25.5; 26; 26.5; 27; 27.5; 28; 28.5; 29; 29.5; 3; 3.5; 30; 30.5; 31; 31.5; 32; 32.5; 33; 33.5; 34; 34.5; 35; 35.5; 36; 36.5; 37; 37.5; 38; 38.5; 39; 39.5; 4; 4.5; 40; 40.5; 41; 41.5; 42; 42.5; 43; 43.5; 44; 44.5; 45; 45.5; 46; 46.5; 47; 47.5; 48; 48.5; 49; 49.5; 5; 5.5; 50; 50.5; 51; 51.5; 52; 52.5; 53; 53.5; 54; 54.5; 55; 55.5; 56; 56.5; 57; 57.5; 58; 58.5; 59; 59.5; 6; 6.5; 60; 7; 7.5; 7XL; 8; 8.5; 8XL; 9; 9.5; Dubbel extra large (XXL); Extra large (XL); Extra small (XS); Large (L); Medium (M); Small (S); Tredubbel extra large (XXXL); Övrigt